California statutes. Commercial Code
(a) An endorsement may be in blank or special. An endorsement in blank includes an endorsement to bearer. A special endorsement specifies to whom a security is to be transferred or who has power to transfer it. A holder may convert a blank endorsement to a special endorsement.

(b) An endorsement purporting to be only of part of a security certificate representing units intended by the issuer to be separately transferable is effective to the extent of the endorsement.

(c) An endorsement, whether special or in blank, does not constitute a transfer until delivery of the certificate on which it appears or, if the endorsement is on a separate document, until delivery of both the document and the certificate.

(d) If a security certificate in registered form has been delivered to a purchaser without a necessary endorsement, the purchaser may become a protected purchaser only when the
 endorsement is supplied. However, against a transferor, a transfer is complete upon delivery and the purchaser has a specifically enforceable right to have any necessary endorsement supplied.

(e) An endorsement of a security certificate in bearer form may give notice of an adverse claim to the certificate, but it does not otherwise affect a right to registration that the holder possesses.

(f) Unless otherwise agreed, a person making an endorsement assumes only the obligations provided in Section 8108 and not an obligation that the security will be honored by the issuer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8305.

(a) If an instruction has been originated by an appropriate person but is incomplete in any other respect, any person may complete it as authorized and the issuer may rely on it as completed, even though it has been completed incorrectly.

(b) Unless otherwise agreed, a person initiating an instruction assumes only the obligations imposed by Section 8108 and not an obligation that the security will be honored by the issuer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8306.

(a) A person who guarantees a signature of an endorser of a security certificate warrants that at the time of signing all of the following were true:

(1) The signature was genuine.

(2) The signer was an appropriate person to endorse, or if the signature is by an agent, the agent had actual authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person.

(3) The signer had legal capacity to sign.

(b) A person who guarantees a signature of the originator of an instruction warrants that at the time of signing all of the following were true:

(1) The signature was genuine.

(2) The signer was an appropriate person to originate the instruction, or if the signature is by an agent, the agent had actual authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person, if the person specified in the instruction as the registered
 owner was, in fact, the registered owner, as to which fact the signature guarantor does not make a warranty.

(3) The signer had legal capacity to sign.

(c) A person who specially guarantees the signature of an originator of an instruction makes the warranties of a signature guarantor under subdivision (b) and also warrants that at the time the instruction is presented to the issuer all of the following are true:

(1) The person specified in the instruction as the registered owner of the uncertificated security will be the registered owner.

(2) The transfer of the uncertificated security requested in the instruction will be registered by the issuer free from all liens, security interests, restrictions, and claims other than those specified in the instruction.

(d) A guarantor under subdivisions (a) and (b) or a special guarantor under subdivision (c) does not otherwise
 warrant the rightfulness of the transfer.

(e) A person who guarantees an endorsement of a security certificate makes the warranties of a signature guarantor under subdivision (a) and also warrants the rightfulness of the transfer in all respects.

(f) A person who guarantees an instruction requesting the transfer of an uncertificated security makes the warranties of a special signature guarantor under subdivision (c) and also warrants the rightfulness of the transfer in all respects.

(g) An issuer may not require a special guaranty of signature, a guaranty of endorsement, or a guaranty of instruction as a condition to registration of transfer.

(h) The warranties under this section are made to a person taking or dealing with the security in reliance on the guaranty, and the guarantor is liable to the person for loss resulting from their breach. An endorser or originator of an instruction whose
 signature, endorsement, or instruction has been guaranteed is liable to a guarantor for any loss suffered by the guarantor as a result of breach of the warranties of the guarantor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8307.

Unless otherwise agreed, the transferor of a security on due demand shall supply the purchaser with proof of authority to transfer or with any other requisite necessary to obtain registration of the transfer of the security, but if the transfer is not for value, a transferor need not comply unless the purchaser pays the necessary expenses. If the transferor fails within a reasonable time to comply with the demand, the purchaser may reject or rescind the transfer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Registration [8401. - 8407.]

8401.

(a) If a certificated security in registered form is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer or an instruction is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer of an uncertificated security, the issuer shall register the transfer as requested if the following conditions are met:

(1) Under the terms of the security the person seeking registration of transfer is eligible to have the security registered in its name.

(2) The endorsement or instruction is made by the appropriate person or by an agent who has actual authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person.

(3) Reasonable assurance is given that the endorsement or instruction is genuine and authorized (Section 8402).

(4) Any applicable law relating to the collection of taxes has been complied with.

(5) The transfer does not violate any
 restriction on transfer imposed by the issuer in accordance with Section 8204.

(6) A demand that the issuer not register transfer has not become effective under Section 8403, or the issuer has complied with subdivision (b) of Section 8403 but no legal process or indemnity bond is obtained as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 8403.

(7) The transfer is in fact rightful or is to a protected purchaser.

(b) If an issuer is under a duty to register a transfer of a security, the issuer is liable to a person presenting a certificated security or an instruction for registration or to the person’s principal for loss resulting from unreasonable delay in registration or failure or refusal to register the transfer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8402.

(a) An issuer may require the following assurance that each necessary endorsement or each instruction is genuine and authorized:

(1) In all cases, a guaranty of the signature of the person making an endorsement or originating an instruction including, in the case of an instruction, reasonable assurance of identity.

(2) If the endorsement is made or the instruction is originated by an agent, appropriate assurance of actual authority to sign.

(3) If the endorsement is made or the instruction is originated by a fiduciary pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of Section 8107, appropriate evidence of appointment or incumbency.

(4) If there is more than one fiduciary, reasonable assurance that all who are required to sign have done so.

(5) If the endorsement is made or the instruction is originated by a person not covered by another
 provision of this subdivision, assurance appropriate to the case corresponding as nearly as may be to the provisions of this subdivision.

(b) An issuer may elect to require reasonable assurance beyond that specified in this section.

(c) In this section:

(1) “Guaranty of the signature” means a guaranty signed by or on behalf of a person reasonably believed by the issuer to be responsible. An issuer may adopt standards with respect to responsibility if they are not manifestly unreasonable.

(2) “Appropriate evidence of appointment or incumbency” means:

(A) In the case of a fiduciary appointed or qualified by a court, a certificate issued by or under the direction or supervision of the court or an officer thereof and dated within 60 days before the date of presentation for transfer.

(B) In any other case, a copy of a document showing the
 appointment or a certificate issued by or on behalf of a person reasonably believed by an issuer to be responsible or, in the absence of that document or certificate, other evidence the issuer reasonably considers appropriate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8403.

(a) A person who is an appropriate person to make an endorsement or originate an instruction may demand that the issuer not register transfer of a security by communicating to the issuer a notification that identifies the registered owner and the issue of which the security is a part and provides an address for communications directed to the person making the demand. The demand is effective only if it is received by the issuer at a time and in a manner affording the issuer reasonable opportunity to act on it.

(b) If a certificated security in registered form is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer or an instruction is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer of an uncertificated security after a demand that the issuer not register transfer has become effective, the issuer shall promptly communicate to (A) the person who initiated the demand at the address provided in the demand and (B) the person who
 presented the security for registration of transfer or initiated the instruction requesting registration of transfer a notification stating all of the following:

(1) The certificated security has been presented for registration of transfer or the instruction for registration of transfer of the uncertificated security has been received.

(2) A demand that the issuer not register transfer had previously been received.

(3) The issuer will withhold registration of transfer for a period of time stated in the notification in order to provide the person who initiated the demand an opportunity to obtain legal process or an indemnity bond.

(c) The period described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) may not exceed 30 days after the date of communication of the notification. A shorter period may be specified by the issuer if it is not manifestly unreasonable.

(d) An issuer is
 not liable to a person who initiated a demand that the issuer not register transfer for any loss the person suffers as a result of registration of a transfer pursuant to an effective endorsement or instruction if the person who initiated the demand does not, within the time stated in the issuer’s communication, either:

(1) Obtain an appropriate restraining order, injunction, or other process from a court of competent jurisdiction enjoining the issuer from registering the transfer.

(2) File with the issuer an indemnity bond, sufficient in the issuer’s judgment to protect the issuer and any transfer agent, registrar, or other agent of the issuer involved from any loss it or they may suffer by refusing to register the transfer.

(e) This section does not relieve an issuer from liability for registering transfer pursuant to an endorsement or instruction that was not effective.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8404.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 8406, an issuer is liable for wrongful registration of transfer if the issuer has registered a transfer of a security to a person not entitled to it, and the transfer was registered in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Pursuant to an ineffective endorsement or instruction.

(2) After a demand that the issuer not register transfer became effective under subdivision (a) of Section 8403(a) and the issuer did not comply with subdivision (b) of Section 8403.

(3) After the issuer had been served with an injunction, restraining order, or other legal process enjoining it from registering the transfer, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, and the issuer had a reasonable opportunity to act on the injunction, restraining order, or other legal process.

(4) By an issuer acting in collusion with the wrongdoer.

(b) An issuer that is liable for wrongful registration of transfer under subdivision (a) on demand shall provide the person entitled to the security with a like certificated or uncertificated security, and any payments or distributions that the person did not receive as a result of the wrongful registration. If an overissue would result, the issuer’s liability to provide the person with a like security is governed by Section 8210.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a) or in a law relating to the collection of taxes, an issuer is not liable to an owner or other person suffering loss as a result of the registration of a transfer of a security if registration was made pursuant to an effective endorsement or instruction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8405.

(a) If an owner of a certificated security, whether in registered or bearer form, claims that the certificate has been lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken, the issuer shall issue a new certificate if the owner does all of the following:

(1) So requests before the issuer has notice that the certificate has been acquired by a protected purchaser.

(2) Files with the issuer a sufficient indemnity bond.

(3) Satisfies other reasonable requirements imposed by the issuer.

(b) If, after the issue of a new security certificate, a protected purchaser of the original certificate presents it for registration of transfer, the issuer shall register the transfer unless an overissue would result. In that case, the issuer’s liability is governed by Section 8210. In addition to any rights on the indemnity bond, an issuer may recover the new certificate from a person to whom
 it was issued or any person taking under that person, except a protected purchaser.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8406.

If a security certificate has been lost, apparently destroyed, or wrongfully taken, and the owner fails to notify the issuer of that fact within a reasonable time after the owner has notice of it and the issuer registers a transfer of the security before receiving notification, the owner may not assert against the issuer a claim for registering the transfer under Section 8404 or a claim to a new security certificate under Section 8405.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8407.

A person acting as authenticating trustee, transfer agent, registrar, or other agent for an issuer in the registration of a transfer of its securities, in the issue of new security certificates or uncertificated securities, or in the cancellation of surrendered security certificates has the same obligation to the holder or owner of a certificated or uncertificated security with regard to the particular functions performed as the issuer has in regard to those functions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Security Entitlements [8501. - 8511.]

8501.

(a) “Securities account” means an account to which a financial asset is or may be credited in accordance with an agreement under which the person maintaining the account undertakes to treat the person for whom the account is maintained as entitled to exercise the rights that comprise the financial asset.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), a person acquires a security entitlement if a securities intermediary does any of the following:

(1) Indicates by book entry that a financial asset has been credited to the person’s securities account.

(2) Receives a financial asset from the person or acquires a financial asset for the person and, in either case, accepts it for credit to the person’s securities account.

(3) Becomes obligated under other law, regulation, or rule to credit a financial asset to the person’s securities account.

(c) If a condition of subdivision (b) has been met, a person has a security entitlement even though the securities intermediary does not itself hold the financial asset.

(d) If a securities intermediary holds a financial asset for another person, and the financial asset is registered in the name of, payable to the order of, or specially endorsed to the other person, and has not been endorsed to the securities intermediary or in blank, the other person is treated as holding the financial asset directly rather than as having a security entitlement with respect to the financial asset.

(e) Issuance of a security is not establishment of a security entitlement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

An action based on an adverse claim to a financial asset, whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien, or other theory, may not be asserted against a person who acquires a security entitlement under Section 8501 for value and without notice of the adverse claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.

(a) To the extent necessary for a securities intermediary to satisfy all security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, all interests in that financial asset held by the securities intermediary are held by the securities intermediary for the entitlement holders, are not property of the securities intermediary, and are not subject to claims of creditors of the securities intermediary, except as otherwise provided in Section 8511.

(b) An entitlement holder’s property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under subdivision (a) is a pro rata property interest in all interests in that financial asset held by the securities intermediary, without regard to the time the entitlement holder acquired the security entitlement or the time the securities intermediary acquired the interest in that financial asset.

(c) An entitlement holder’s property interest with respect to a particular
 financial asset under subdivision (a) may be enforced against the securities intermediary only by exercise of the entitlement holder’s rights under Sections 8505 to 8508, inclusive.

(d) An entitlement holder’s property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under subdivision (a) may be enforced against a purchaser of the financial asset or interest therein only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Insolvency proceedings have been initiated by or against the securities intermediary.

(2) The securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in the financial asset to satisfy the security entitlements of all of its entitlement holders to that financial asset.

(3) The securities intermediary violated its obligations under Section 8504 by transferring the financial asset or interest therein to the purchaser.

(4) The purchaser is not
 protected under subdivision (e). The trustee or other liquidator, acting on behalf of all entitlement holders having security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, may recover the financial asset, or interest therein, from the purchaser. If the trustee or other liquidator elects not to pursue that right, an entitlement holder whose security entitlement remains unsatisfied has the right to recover its interest in the financial asset from the purchaser.

(e) An action based on the entitlement holder’s property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under subdivision (a), whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien, or other theory, may not be asserted against any purchaser of a financial asset or interest therein who gives value, obtains control, and does not act in collusion with the securities intermediary in violating the securities intermediary’s obligations under Section 8504.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.

(a) A securities intermediary shall promptly obtain and thereafter maintain a financial asset in a quantity corresponding to the aggregate of all security entitlements it has established in favor of its entitlement holders with respect to that financial asset. The securities intermediary may maintain those financial assets directly or through one or more other securities intermediaries.

(b) Except to the extent otherwise agreed by its entitlement holder, a securities intermediary may not grant any security interests in a financial asset it is obligated to maintain pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) A securities intermediary satisfies the duty in subdivision (a) if it does either of the following:

(1) The securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary.

(2) In the absence of
 agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to obtain and maintain the financial asset.

(d) This section does not apply to a clearing corporation that is itself the obligor of an option or similar obligation to which its entitlement holders have security entitlements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.

(a) A securities intermediary shall take action to obtain a payment or distribution made by the issuer of a financial asset. A securities intermediary satisfies the duty if it does either of the following:

(1) The securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary.

(2) In the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to attempt to obtain the payment or distribution.

(b) A securities intermediary is obligated to its entitlement holder for a payment or distribution made by the issuer of a financial asset if the payment or distribution is received by the securities intermediary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8506.

A securities intermediary shall exercise rights with respect to a financial asset if directed to do so by an entitlement holder. A securities intermediary satisfies the duty if it does either of the following:

(1) The securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary.

(2) In the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary either places the entitlement holder in a position to exercise the rights directly or exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to follow the direction of the entitlement holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8507.

(a) A securities intermediary shall comply with an entitlement order if the entitlement order is originated by the appropriate person, the securities intermediary has had reasonable opportunity to assure itself that the entitlement order is genuine and authorized, and the securities intermediary has had reasonable opportunity to comply with the entitlement order. A securities intermediary satisfies the duty if it does either of the following:

(1) The securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary.

(2) In the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to comply with the entitlement order.

(b) If a securities intermediary transfers a financial asset pursuant to an ineffective entitlement order, the securities intermediary shall
 reestablish a security entitlement in favor of the person entitled to it, and pay or credit any payments or distributions that the person did not receive as a result of the wrongful transfer. If the securities intermediary does not reestablish a security entitlement, the securities intermediary is liable to the entitlement holder for damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8508.

A securities intermediary shall act at the direction of an entitlement holder to change a security entitlement into another available form of holding for which the entitlement holder is eligible, or to cause the financial asset to be transferred to a securities account of the entitlement holder with another securities intermediary. A securities intermediary satisfies the duty if it does either of the following:

(1) The securities intermediary acts as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary.

(2) In the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to follow the direction of the entitlement holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8509.

(a) If the substance of a duty imposed upon a securities intermediary by Sections 8504 to 8508, inclusive, is the subject of a federal statute, regulation, or rule, compliance with that statute, regulation, or rule satisfies the duty.

(b) To the extent that specific standards for the performance of the duties of a securities intermediary or the exercise of the rights of an entitlement holder are not specified by other statute, regulation, or rule or by agreement between the securities intermediary and entitlement holder, the securities intermediary shall perform its duties and the entitlement holder shall exercise its rights in a commercially reasonable manner.

(c) The obligation of a securities intermediary to perform the duties imposed by Sections 8504 to 8508, inclusive, is subject to the following:

(1) Rights of the securities intermediary arising out of a security interest under
 a security agreement with the entitlement holder or otherwise.

(2) Rights of the securities intermediary under other law, regulation, rule, or agreement to withhold performance of its duties as a result of unfulfilled obligations of the entitlement holder to the securities intermediary.

(d) Sections 8504 to 8508, inclusive, do not require a securities intermediary to take any action that is prohibited by other statute, regulation, or rule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8510.

(a) In a case not covered by the priority rules in Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) or the rules stated in subdivision (c), an action based on an adverse claim to a financial asset or security entitlement, whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien, or other theory, may not be asserted against a person who purchases a security entitlement, or an interest therein, from an entitlement holder if the purchaser gives value, does not have notice of the adverse claim, and obtains control.

(b) If an adverse claim could not have been asserted against an entitlement holder under Section 8502, the adverse claim cannot be asserted against a person who purchases a security entitlement, or an interest therein, from the entitlement holder.

(c) In a case not covered by the priority rules in Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), a purchaser for value of a security entitlement, or an
 interest therein, who obtains control has priority over a purchaser of a security entitlement, or an interest therein, who does not obtain control. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), purchasers who have control rank according to priority in time of any of the following:

(1) The purchaser’s becoming the person for whom the securities account, in which the security entitlement is carried, is maintained, if the purchaser obtained control under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 8106.

(2) The securities intermediary’s agreement to comply with the purchaser’s entitlement orders with respect to security entitlements carried or to be carried in the securities account in which the security entitlement is carried, if the purchaser obtained control under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 8106.

(3) If the purchaser obtained control through another person under paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of
 Section 8106, the time on which priority would be based under this subdivision if the other person were the secured party.

(d) A securities intermediary as purchaser has priority over a conflicting purchaser who has control unless otherwise agreed by the securities intermediary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 33.41.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

8511.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), if a securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in a particular financial asset to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements to that financial asset and its obligation to a creditor of the securities intermediary who has a security interest in that financial asset, the claims of entitlement holders, other than the creditor, have priority over the claim of the creditor.

(b) A claim of a creditor of a securities intermediary who has a security interest in a financial asset held by a securities intermediary has priority over claims of the securities intermediary’s entitlement holders who have security entitlements with respect to that financial asset if the creditor has control over the financial asset.

(c) If a clearing corporation does not have sufficient financial assets to satisfy both its
 obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements with respect to a financial asset and its obligation to a creditor of the clearing corporation who has a security interest in that financial asset, the claim of the creditor has priority over the claims of entitlement holders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Transition Provisions [8601. - 8603.]

8601.

This division becomes operative January 1, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8603.

(a) This division does not affect an action or proceeding commenced before this division becomes operative.

(b) If a security interest in a security is perfected at the date this division becomes operative, and the action by which the security interest was perfected would suffice to perfect a security interest under this division, no further action is required to continue perfection. If a security interest in a security is perfected at the date this division takes effect but the action by which the security interest was perfected would not suffice to perfect a security interest under this division, the security interest remains perfected for a period of four months after the operative date and continues perfected thereafter if appropriate action to perfect under this division is taken within that period. If a security interest is perfected at the date this division becomes operative and the security interest can be perfected by filing under
 Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), a financing statement signed by the secured party instead of the debtor may be filed within that period to continue perfection or thereafter to perfect and that financing statement shall contain a statement that it is being filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 33.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. SECURED TRANSACTIONS [9101. - 9907.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [9101. - 9110.]

9101.

This division may be cited as the Uniform Commercial Code-Secured Transactions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9102.

(a) In this division:

(1) “Accession” means goods that are physically united with other goods in such a manner that the identity of the original goods is not lost.

(2) “Account,” except as used in “account for,” “account statement,” “account to,” “commodity account” in paragraph (14), “customer’s account,” “deposit account” in paragraph (29), “on account of,” and “statement of account,” means a right to payment of a monetary obligation, whether or not earned by performance, (i) for property that has been or is to be sold, leased, licensed, assigned, or otherwise disposed of, (ii) for services
 rendered or to be rendered, (iii) for a policy of insurance issued or to be issued, (iv) for a secondary obligation incurred or to be incurred, (v) for energy provided or to be provided, (vi) for the use or hire of a vessel under a charter or other contract, (vii) arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card, or (viii) as winnings in a lottery or other game of chance operated or sponsored by a state, governmental unit of a state, or person licensed or authorized to operate the game by a state or governmental unit of a state. The term includes controllable accounts and health care insurance receivables. The term does not include (i)
 chattel paper, (ii) commercial tort claims, (iii) deposit accounts, (iv) investment property, (v) letter-of-credit rights or letters of credit, (vi) rights to payment for money or funds advanced or sold, other than rights arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card, or (vii) rights to payment evidenced by an instrument.

(3) “Account debtor” means a person obligated on an account, chattel paper, or general intangible. The term does not include persons obligated to pay a negotiable instrument, even if the
 negotiable instrument evidences chattel paper.

(4) “Accounting,” except as used in “accounting for,” means a record that is all of the following:

(A) Signed by a secured party.

(B) Indicating the aggregate unpaid secured obligations as of a date not more than 35 days earlier or 35 days later than the date of the record.

(C) Identifying the components of the obligations in reasonable detail.

(5) “Agricultural lien” means an interest in farm products that meets all of the following conditions:

(A) It secures payment or
 performance of an obligation for either of the following:

(i) Goods or services furnished in connection with a debtor’s farming operation.

(ii) Rent on real property leased by a debtor in connection with its farming operation.

(B) It is created by statute in favor of a person that does either of the following:

(i) In the ordinary course of its business furnished goods or services to a debtor in connection with a debtor’s farming operation.

(ii) Leased real property to a debtor in connection with the debtor’s farming operation.

(C) Its effectiveness does not depend on the person’s possession of the personal property.

(6) “As-extracted collateral” means either of the following:

(A) Oil, gas, or other minerals that are subject to a security interest that does both of the following:

(i) Is created by a debtor having an interest in the minerals before extraction.

(ii) Attaches to the minerals as extracted.

(B) Accounts arising out of the sale at the wellhead or minehead of oil, gas, or other minerals in which the debtor had an interest before extraction.

(7) [Reserved]

(8) “Bank” means an organization that is engaged in the business of banking. The term includes savings banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions, and trust companies.

(9) “Cash proceeds” means proceeds that are money, checks, deposit accounts, or the like.

(10) “Certificate of title” means a certificate of title with respect to which a statute provides for the security interest in question to be indicated on the certificate as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral. The term includes another record maintained as an alternative to a certificate of title by the governmental unit that
 issues certificates of title if a statute permits the security interest in question to be indicated on the record as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral.

(11) (A) “Chattel paper” means either of the following:

(i) A right to payment of a monetary obligation secured by specific goods, if the right to payment and security agreement are evidenced by a record.

(ii) A right to payment of a monetary obligation owed by a lessee under a lease agreement with respect to specific goods and a monetary obligation owed by the lessee in connection with the transaction giving rise to the lease, if both of the following
 are met:

(I) The right to payment and lease agreement are evidenced by a record.

(II) The predominant purpose of the transaction giving rise to the lease was to give the lessee the right to possession and use of the goods.

(B) “Chattel paper” does not include a right to payment arising out of a charter or other contract involving the use or hire of a vessel or a right to payment arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card.

(12) “Collateral” means the property subject to a security interest or agricultural lien. The term includes all of the following:

(A) Proceeds to which a security interest attaches.

(B) Accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, and promissory notes that have been sold.

(C) Goods that are the subject of a consignment.

(13) “Commercial tort claim” means a claim arising in tort with respect to which either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(A) The claimant is an organization.

(B) The claimant is an individual and both of the following conditions are satisfied regarding the claim:
